algorithms/polish.sbl
externals ( stem )

// escape symbols for substituting polish characters
stringescapes { }

/* Special characters in Unicode Latin Extended-A */
// special vowels
stringdef a'   '{U+0105}'  // ą a + ogonek
stringdef e'   '{U+0119}'  // ę e + ogonek
stringdef o'   '{U+00F3}'  // ó o + acute

// special consonants
stringdef c'   '{U+0107}'  // ć c + acute
stringdef l\   '{U+0142}'  // ł l + stroke
stringdef n'   '{U+0144}'  // ń n + acute
stringdef s'   '{U+015B}'  // ś s + acute
stringdef z'   '{U+017A}'  // ź z + acute
stringdef z.   '{U+017C}'  // ż z + dot

// [C](VC)^m[V|C]
// definitions of variables for
// p1 - position of m = 0
integers ( p1 )

// groupings
// v - polish vowels
groupings ( v )

// v - all polish vowels
define v 'aeiyou{a'}{e'}{o'}'

// all polish stemmer routines
routines (
  //names of most routines approximately represent Polish inflection patterns described at www.sgjp.pl
  A1 A3 B1 B1l B2ce B2cei B3u B3w B4ni B4r C3 D1c0i generic word V01 V03 V04 V05 V06 V06y V08ujeiwa V08ujeywa verb_general common
)

backwardmode (

  define common as (
    [substring] among (
      'y' 'em' 'i' 'a' 'cie' 'o'
    )

    delete
  )

  define verb_general as (
    substring among (
      'sz' 'my' 'cie' 'em' 'e{s'}' 'am' 'a{s'}' 'a' 'om' 'o{s'}' 'o' 'i{s'}my' 'i{s'}cie' 'i' 'y{s'}my' 'y{s'}cie' 'y' 'bym' 'by{s'}' 'by' 'abym' 'aby{s'}' 'aby' 'obym' 'obyś' 'oby' 'iby{s'}my' 'iby{s'}cie' 'iby' 'yby{s'}my' 'yby{s'}cie' 'yby' 'szy'
    )
  )

  define A1 as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'ego' 'm' 'ch' 'mi' 'a' 'ej' '{a'}' // 'e', 'em', 'emu' deleted bcs of understemming
    )
    
    test 'i'
    delete
  )

  define A3 as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'ki' 'kiego' 'kiemu' 'kim' 'cy' 'kie' 'kich' 'kimi' 
      'ka' 'kiej' 'k{a'}'
    )
    
    test 's'
    delete
  )

  define B1 as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'ia' 'iowi' 'iem' 'iu' 'iom' 'iami' 'iach' 'i{o'}w' // 'i', 'ie' deleted bcs of understemming
    )
    
    test 'b' or 'p' or 'm' or 'w' //TODO: specjalne przypadki np. Bolcie
    delete
  )

  define B1l as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'a' 'owi' 'u' 'om' 'ami' 'ach' // 'i', 'e', 'em' deleted bcs of understemming
    )
    
    test 'l'
    delete
  )

  define B2ce as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'ec' 'ca' 'cowi' 'cem' 'cu' 'cy' 'ce' 'c{o'}w' 'com' 'cami' 'cach'
    )
    
    test 'j' or 'l' or '{z.}'
    delete
  )

  define B2cei as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'iec' 'ca' 'cowi' 'cem' 'cu' 'cy' 'ce' 'c{o'}w' 'com' 'cami' 'cach'
    )
    
    test 'w' //TODO some exceptions
    delete
  )

  define B3u as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'u' 'owi' 'iem' '{o'}w' 'om' 'ami' 'ach' // 'i' deleted bcs of understemming
    )

    test 'k' or 'g'
    delete
  )

  define B3w as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'a' 'owi' 'iem' 'u' '{o'}w' 'om' 'ami' 'ach' // 'i', 'owie' deleted bcs of understemming
    )

    test 'k' or 'g'
    delete
  )

  define B4ni as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'in' 'ina' 'inowi' 'inem' 'inie' 'y' 'om' 'ami' 'ach' '{o'}w' // 'ie' deleted bcs of understemming
    )

    test 'n'
    delete
  )

  define B4r as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'u' 'owi' 'ze' 'y' '{o'}w' 'om' 'ami' 'ach' 'a' 'zy' // 'owie', 'em' deleted bcs of understemming
    )

    test 'r'
    delete
  )

  define C3 as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      'a' 'u' 'iem' 'om' 'ami' 'ach' // 'e' deleted bcs of understemming
    )

    test 'k' or 'g'
    delete
  )

  define D1c0i as ( //spec
    [substring] among (
      '{c'}' 'ci' 'ci{a'}' 'ciom' 'ciami' 'ciach'
    )

    test '{s'}'
    delete
  )

  define generic as (
    [try verb_general substring] among (
      //noun
      'eg' 'emu' 'ym' 'e' 'ych' 'owie'
      '{o'}w' 'om' 'am' 'ach'
      'ej' '{a'}' //conflicts with A3 for sure
      '{n'}' 'n' 'niow' 'niu' 'nie' 'niam' 'niach' 'ni{o'}w'
      '{s'}' 's' 'siow' 'siu' 'sie' 'siam' 'siach' 'si{o'}w'
      'niec' '{n'}c' '{n'}cow' '{n'}cu' '{n'}ce' '{n'}c{o'}w' '{n'}cam' '{n'}cach'
      'ow' 'u'
      'gow' 'g' 'gu' 'dz' 'g{o'}w' 'gam' 'gach'
      'k' 'kow' 'ku' 'c' 'k{o'}w' 'kam' 'kach' 'ek' 'kowie'
      'ie' //overstemming: 'akwamary-nie'
      'ciu' '{c'}' 'ciam' 'ciach'

      'ni' 'si' 'gi' 'ki' 'ci'
      
      
      '{e'}'
      
      'ce' 'k{e'}' 'k{a'}'
      
      //verb
      'eje' 'ej{e'}' 'ej{a'}' 'e{c'}' 'a{l\}' 'aw' 'el' 'an' 'en' 'e{n'}'
      'uje' 'uj{e'}' 'uj{a'}' 'uj' 'owa{c'}' 'owa{l\}' 'owaw' 'owal' 'owan' 'owa{n'}' 'owani'
      'n{e'}' 'n{a'}' 'nij' 'n{a'}{c'}' '{l\}' 'l' 'ni{e'}t' 'ni{e'}c' 'ni{e'}{c'}' 'ni{e'}ci'
      'ij' '{a'}{c'}' '{a'}{l\}' '{a'}w' '{e'}{l\}' '{e'}l' 'i{e'}t' 'i{e'}c' 'i{e'}{c'}' 'i{e'}ci'
      'n{a'}{l\}' 'n{a'}w' 'n{e'}{l\}' 'n{e'}l' //TODO check for vowel
      'c{e'}' 'c{a'}' 'ci{c'}' 'ci{l\}' 'ciw' 'cil' 'con' 'cen' 'ce{n'}' 'ceni'
      'i{e'}' 'i{a'}' 'i{c'}' 'i{l\}' 'il' 'ion' 'ien' 'ie{n'}' 'ieni'
      'j' 'w' 'on' 'eni'
      'iw'
      'z' 'z{e'}' 'z{a'}' '{z'}' 'zi{c'}' 'zi{l\}' 'ziw' 'zil' 'zon' 'zen' 'ze{n'}' 'zeni'
      'ywa{c'}' 'ywa{l\}' 'ywaw' 'ywal' 'ywan' 'ywa{n'}' 'ywani'
    )

    delete
  )

  define word as (
    V08ujeiwa or A1 or A3 or B1 or B1l or B2ce or B2cei or B3u or B3w or B4ni or B4r or C3 or D1c0i or generic or V06y or V01 or common
  )

  define V01 as ( //spec
    [try verb_general substring] among (
      'm' 'j{a'}' 'j' '{c'}' '{l\}' 'l' 'n' '{n'}' 'ni'
    )

    test 'a'
    delete
  )

  define V03 as (
    [substring] among (
      'eje' 'ej{e'}' 'ej{a'}' 'ej' 'e{c'}' 'a{l\}' 'aw' 'el' 'an' 'en' 'e{n'}'
    )

    delete
  )

  define V04 as (
    [substring] among (
      'uje' 'uj{e'}' 'uj{a'}' 'uj' 'owa{c'}' 'owa{l\}' 'owaw' 'owal' 'owan' 'owa{n'}' 'owani'
    )

    delete
  )

  define V05 as (
    [substring] among (
      'nie' 'n{e'}' 'n{a'}' 'nij' 'n{a'}{c'}' '{l\}' 'l' 'ni{e'}t' 'ni{e'}c' 'ni{e'}{c'}' 'ni{e'}ci'
      'ie' '{e'}' '{a'}' 'ij' '{a'}{c'}' '{a'}{l\}' '{a'}w' '{e'}{l\}' '{e'}l' 'i{e'}t' 'i{e'}c' 'i{e'}{c'}' 'i{e'}ci'
      '{n'}' 'n{a'}{l\}' 'n{a'}w' 'n{e'}{l\}' 'n{e'}l' //TODO check for vowel
    )

    delete
  )

  define V06 as (
    [substring] among (
      'ci' 'c{e'}' 'c{a'}' '{c'}' 'ci{c'}' 'ci{l\}' 'ciw' 'cil' 'con' 'cen' 'ce{n'}' 'ceni'
      'i' 'i{e'}' 'i{a'}' 'i{c'}' 'i{l\}' 'il' 'ion' 'ien' 'ie{n'}' 'ieni'
      '{e'}' '{a'}' 'j' '{l\}' 'w' 'l' 'on' 'en' 'e{n'}' 'eni'
      'iw'
      'zi' 'z{e'}' 'z{a'}' '{z'}' 'zi{c'}' 'zi{l\}' 'ziw' 'zil' 'zon' 'zen' 'ze{n'}' 'zeni'
    )

    delete
  )

  define V06y as ( //spec
    [try verb_general substring] among (
      'y' '{e'}' '{a'}' 'y{c'}' 'y{l\}' 'yw' 'yl' 'on' 'en' 'e{n'}' 'eni' //understemming with '{l\}'
    )

    test 'z' or '{z.}'
    delete
  )

  define V08ujeiwa as ( //spec
    [try verb_general substring] among (
      'uje' 'uj{e'}' 'uj{a'}' 'uj' 'iwa{c'}' 'iwa{l\}' 'iwaw' 'iwal' 'iwan' 'iwa{n'}' 'iwani'
    )

    test 'k' or 'g' or 'h'
    delete
  )

  define V08ujeywa as (
    [substring] among (
      'uje' 'uj{e'}' 'uj{a'}' 'uj' 'ywa{c'}' 'ywa{l\}' 'ywaw' 'ywal' 'ywan' 'ywa{n'}' 'ywani'
    )

    delete
  )

)

define stem as (

  $p1 = limit

  backwards (
    do word
  )

)
